Hawaii statutes.
§261-52 Powers. In addition and
supplemental to the powers granted to the department by law, the department
may:

(1) With the approval of the governor, enter into a
special facility lease or an amendment or supplement thereto whereby the
department agrees to construct, acquire, or remodel and furnish or equip a
special facility solely for the use by another person to a special facility
lease;

(2) With the approval of the governor, issue special
facility revenue bonds in principal amounts that may be necessary to yield the
amount of the cost of any construction, acquisition, remodeling, furnishing,
and equipping of any special facility, including the costs of acquisition of
the site thereof; provided that the total principal amount of the special facility
revenue bonds which may be issued pursuant to the authorization of this
paragraph shall not exceed $200,000,000; provided further that these funds
shall not be expended on nonpublic air facilities;

(3) With the approval of the governor, issue
refunding special facility revenue bonds with which to provide for the payment
of outstanding special facility revenue bonds (including any special facility
revenue bonds theretofore issued for this purpose) or any part thereof;
provided any issuance of refunding special facility revenue bonds shall not
reduce the principal amount of the bonds which may be issued as provided in
paragraph (2);

(4) Perform and carry out the terms and provisions of
any special facility lease;

(5) Notwithstanding section 103-7 or any other law to
the contrary, acquire, construct, or remodel and furnish or equip any special
facility, or accept the assignment of any contract therefor entered into by the
other person to the special facility lease;

(6) Construct any special facility on land owned by
the State; provided that no funds derived herein will be expended for land
acquisition; and

(7) Agree with the other person to the special
facility lease whereby any acquisition, construction, remodeling, furnishing,
or equipping of the special facility and the expenditure of moneys therefor
shall be undertaken or supervised by another person. [L 1971, c 160, pt of §1;
am L 1977, c 29, §1; am L 1982, c 146, §1; am L 1991, c 168, §1; am L Sp 1993,
c 8, §55; am L 1998, c 284, §1; am L 2004, c 216, §32]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next